Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,242
Bed and breakfast establishment, defined.

Bed and breakfast establishment shall mean any place of lodging that provides rented rooms to ten or fewer people, that is the personal residence of the owner, that is occupied by the owner at the time of rental, and in which the only meal served to renters is breakfast.

Laws 1989, LB 548, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-216.39;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 11.